 







<USDEPT>DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES</USDEPT>



<USBUREAU>Food and Drug Administration</USBUREAU>



<CFRNO>21 CFR Part 101</CFRNO>




<RINDOCK>[Docket No. 91N384D]</RINDOCK>




<RINDOCK>RIN 0905AD96</RINDOCK>



Food Labeling; Requirements for Nutrient Content Claims for Dietary Supplements of Vitamins, Minerals, Herbs,
and Other 
Similar Nutritionnal Substances


<AGENCY>
AGENCY: 

Food and Drug Administration, HHS.


</AGENCY>
<ACTION>
ACTION: 

Final rule.



</ACTION>
<SUMMARY>
SUMMARY: 

The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is amending its regulations to: (1) Include dietary supplements of vitamins,
minerals, herbs, and other similar nutritional substances (hereinafter referred to as ``dietary supplements'')
under the coverage of the general principles for nutrient content claims; (2) provide for the use of expressed and
implied nutrient content claims on labels or in labeling of dietary supplements; and (3) provide for petitions for
nutrient content claims for dietary supplements. This final rule is in response to the Nutrition Labeling and Education
Act of 1990 and to the Dietary Supplement Act of 1992. 


</SUMMARY>
<DATE>
EFFECTIVE DATE:

 July 1, 1995.


</DATE>
<FURTHER>
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:

 Camille E. Brewer, Center for Food Safety and Applied Nutrition (HFS165), Food and Drug Administration, 200
C St. SW., Washington, DC 20204, 2022055483. 


</FURTHER>
<SUPPLEM>
SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:




I. Regulatory History


On November 8, 1990, President Bush signed into law the Nutrition Labeling and Education Act of 1990 (the 1990 amendments)
(Pub. L. 101535). The 1990 amendments revised the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (the act) in a number
of important ways. One of the most notable aspects of the 1990 amendments is that they establish FDA's authority to
regulate nutrient content claims on food labels and in food labeling. Section 403(r)(1)(A) of the act, which was added
by the 1990 amendments, provides that a product is misbranded if it bears a claim in its label or labeling that either
expressly or implicitly characterizes the level of any nutrient of the type required to be declared as part of nutrition
labeling, unless such claim has been specifically defined (or otherwise exempted) by regulation. The 1990 amendments
also direct the Secretary and, by delegation, FDA to promulgate regulations to define specific nutrient content
claims including ``free,'' ``low,'' ``light'' or ``lite,'' ``reduced,'' ``less,'' and ``high'' (section 3(b)(1)(A)(iii)
of the 1990 amendments).
In the 

Federal Register

 of November 27, 1991 (56 FR 60421 and 56 FR 60478), FDA published two documents in which it proposed, among other things,
to define nutrient content claims, to provide for their use on foods labels, and to establish procedures for the submission
and review of petitions regarding the use of specific nutrient content claims. These proposals applied to dietary
supplements as well as foods in conventional food form. 
On October 6, 1992, the President signed the Dietary Supplement Act of 1992, Title II of Pub. L. 102571 (the DS
act). Section 202(a)(1) of the DS act established a moratorium on the implementation of the 1990 amendments with respect
to dietary supplements until December 15, 1993. Section 202(a)(2)(A) required the Secretary, and by delegation
FDA, to issue proposed regulations on nutrient content claims for dietary supplements no later than June 15, 1993.

FDA issued final regulations that implemented the 1990 amendments with respect to nutrient content claims on foods
in conventional food form on January 6, 1993 (hereinafter referred to as the ``final rule on nutrient content claims'')
(58 FR 2302). FDA modified these final regulations slightly in a document that made technical corrections to them
(58 FR 44020, August 18, 1993) (hereinafter referred to as ``the technical corrections document''). In response
to the requirements of the DS act, FDA published in the 

Federal Register

 of June 18, 1993 (58 FR 33731) a proposal to: (1) Include dietary supplements under the coverage of the general principles
for nutrient content claims; (2) provide for the use of expressed and implied nutrient content claims on labels or
in labeling of dietary supplements; and (3) provide for petitions for nutrient content claims for dietary supplements
(hereinafter referred to as the ``proposal on nutrient content claims for dietary supplements''). 
FDA received approximately 500 letters in response to its June 18, 1993, proposal on nutrient content claims for dietary
supplements. Each letter contained one or more comments. The letters were from a wide range of sources, including
consumers; consumer organizations; professional associations; Federal, State, and local government agencies;
industry; and industry trade associations. Many comments generally supported the proposal or various provisions
of the proposal. Other comments addressed issues outside the scope of the proposal (e.g., freedom of choice, access
to health care, access to dietary supplements) and will not be discussed here. Many comments suggested modifications,
revisions, or revocations of various aspects of the proposal. A summary of the comments, the agency's responses to
the comments, and a complete discussion of the agency's conclusions with respect to nutrient content claims for dietary
supplements follows. 


II. Nutrient Content Claims for Dietary Supplements_FDA Authority


1. A couple of comments contended that FDA lacks the statutory authority to prohibit claims for substances for which
no reference value (i.e., Reference Daily Intake (RDI) or Daily Reference Value (DRV)) has been established. The
comments also stated that the agency lacks legal authority to promulgate regulations governing products bearing
a nutrient content claim for a nutrient or other substance not explicitly named in section 403(q)(1) or (q)(2) of the
1990 amendments. The comments said that the references to section 403(q)(1) or (q)(2) of the act are references to
those nutrients that the 1990 amendments require to be listed (``mandatory nutrients'') on the nutrition label.
The comments argued that under these provisions, a food may be subject to a misbranding charge under section 403(r)(1)
of the act only if it characterizes, either explicitly or implicitly, the level of a mandatory nutrient in the food.

The comments also stated that the 1990 amendments did not provide FDA with misbranding authority over products that
bear a claim characterizing the level of a nutrient or other substance that is not listed in section 403(q)(1) or (q)(2)
of the act. The comments maintained that, regardless of whether a RDI or DRV has been established, no special requirements
should apply if a manufacturer of a substance not covered by section 403(q)(1) or (q)(2), such as garlic, wished to
claim that his product was ``high in garlic'' or a ``good source of garlic.'' The comments argued that while FDA maintains
its general misbranding authority over products bearing claims that characterize the level of a nonmandatory substance,
FDA still must meet its burden of proving that any such claims are actually ``false or misleading in any particular''
under the general misbranding provision, section 403(a)(1) of the act.
Section 403(r)(1)(A) of the act states that a food intended for human consumption is misbranded if it bears a claim
that expressly or by implication ``characterizes the level of any nutrient which is of the type required by paragraph
(q)(1) or (q)(2) to be in the label or labeling of the food * * *.'' The statute uses the same language in section 403(r)(1)(B)
to describe the substances that could be the subject of a health claim. A health claim is a claim that ``characterizes
the relationship of any nutrient which is of the type required by paragraph (q)(1) or (q)(2) to be in the label or labeling
of the food to a disease or a health-related condition  * * *.'' Under section
403(r)(1)(B), a health claim may be made in accordance with section 403(r)(5)(D) as well as section 403(r)(3). Thus,
because a statute must be read as a whole, the language in section 403(r)(1)(A) and (r)(1)(B) of the act that describes
the substances that may be the subject of a nutrient content or of a health claim must be read in conjunction with section
403(r)(5)(D), which addresses health claims for vitamins, minerals, herbs, or other similar nutritional substances
that are components of dietary supplements. Thus, the ``nutrients of the type required by paragraph (q)(1) or (q)(2)''
that are the subject of sections 403(r)(1)(A) and (r)(1)(B) of the act include vitamins, minerals, herbs, and other
similar nutritional substances. 
The legislative history of ``other nutritional substances'' reveals that its coverage is broad and could, in appropriate
circumstances, include garlic. See 136 Cong. Record S16609 (daily ed. October 24, 1990) (discussion between Senators
Metzenbaum and Symms). Therefore, while a label claim that a food contains garlic that is intended to describe the
taste of the food would not be subject to section 403(r)(1)(A) of the act, a claim that describes the garlic content
in a way that reveals that garlic is being referred to as a nutritional substance would be subject to that section. Under
section 403(r)(1)(A) of the act, the latter claim would misbrand the food unless its use has been authorized by FDA
under section 403(r)(2). Thus, FDA rejects the comments that disagreed with the proposed coverage of the nutrient
content claim provisions.
FDA has relied on the RDI's and DRV's in defining nutrient content claims under section 403(r)(2) of the act because
it has concluded that if the characterization of the level of a nutrient is to have any meaning, there must be a level
that can be used as a reference in determining whether the characterization is valid and appropriate. The RDI's and
DRV's provide such levels. Thus, in 101.54(a) (21 CFR 101.54(a)), FDA has limited the use of ``good source,''
``high,'' and ``more'' claims to use with nutrients for which an RDI or DRV has been established. FDA is not aware of
any other alternative standards.
If interested persons are aware of other standards that can be used as reference values to establish the validity of
content claims for substances for which RDI's and DRV's have not been established, those persons should make FDA aware
of those standards through 101.69 (21 CFR 101.69) or other appropriate means. FDA will carefully consider
using such standards as the basis for content claims for the substances involved.


III. Basis for Nutrient Content Claims For Dietary Supplements


A. Relationship to January 6, 1993 Final Rules, Consistency with Established Nutrient Content Claims, Scope


2. Many comments supported consistency in definitions for nutrient content claims between foods in conventional
food form and dietary supplements. However, one comment stated that consistency in definitions for nutrient content
claims for dietary supplements and foods in conventional food form is inappropriate. The comment argued that FDA
has chosen to define nutrient content claims that are not meaningful to the supplement industry and to consumers.

Many comments pointed out that dietary supplements are intended to contribute, with foods in conventional food form,
to consumers' daily nutrient intake. Thus, the comments argued that it is important that the terms used to describe
the levels of nutrients in both dietary supplements and foods in conventional food form be consistent. These comments
maintained that consumers would be confused if claims were to be allowed on dietary supplements that were not defined
in the same manner as those for foods in conventional food form.
FDA disagrees with the comments that said that consistency with established nutrient content claims is inappropriate
as a basic principle for defining nutrient content claims for dietary supplements. There is much about dietary supplements
that suggests that the principles that guide FDA in defining nutrient content claims for dietary supplements should
be the same as the principles that guide the agency in defining nutrient content claims on foods in conventional food
form. Dietary supplements that are not intended for use as drugs have traditionally been regulated as foods and, as
such, must be evaluated within the context of the total daily diet. In addition, nutrients from dietary supplements
serve the same physiological function as nutrients from foods in conventional food form. While some consumers seek
to ensure that the nutrient content of their diet is adequate through foods in conventional food form, other consumers
seek to ensure nutritional adequacy by making dietary supplements part of their diets (Ref. 1). Consistent use of
terms on dietary supplements and on foods in conventional food form will thus help consumers to construct a nutritionally
adequate total daily diet by allowing consumers to make meaningful comparisons among these products. It will also
facilitate use of these terms by consumers.
Over the years, FDA has stressed the importance of consistent definitions and descriptive terms as a necessary requirement
for effective education and for preventing misleading labeling (Ref. 2). If terms were given different definitions
depending on whether they were to be used to describe foods in conventional food form or dietary supplements, it would
make it much more difficult for the public to understand what these terms are intended to convey about a particular
food. Moreover, a single definition for a particular term eliminates any possibility that ambiguities could be created
by the use of that term. Therefore, the agency concludes that for nutrient content claims, the definition of a particular
term should be the same regardless of the type of food that it is being used to describe.
Additionally, FDA has been criticized for treating dietary supplements differently than other foods. FDA has no
desire to discriminate in any way against supplements. Thus, by having a single definition for a particular nutrient
content claim, FDA is providing the basis for dietary supplements to make the same claims as other foods and to be factored
into the diet like other foods. 
Nonetheless, as discussed in the proposal on nutrient content claims for dietary supplements (58 FR 33731), FDA recognizes
that dietary supplements differ in at least two respects from foods in conventional food form. First, dietary supplements
are likely to contain much higher levels of nutrients than foods in conventional food form. Thus, additional nutrient
content claims that are specific for dietary supplements may be appropriate. As discussed later in this document,
the agency intends in the near future to initiate a separate rulemaking to establish such claims for dietary supplements.
Second, dietary supplements generally do not contain several nutrients (e.g., fat, cholesterol) found in foods
in conventional food form. Therefore, in this document, FDA is limiting the use of certain claims that are useful for
describing foods in conventional food form but that do not meaningfully describe dietary supplements.


B. General Principles


1. Substitute Foods 


3. One comment objected to the requirement to use the word ``imitation'' on dietary supplements that are nutritionally
inferior to other products of the same type. The comment argued that FDA was never given the authority to decide on formulations
of dietary supplements, and that setting such formulations is the exclusive role of the manufacturer. Further, the
comment stated that there is nothing ``imitation'' about ``less'' in the supplement industry, and that a requirement
that a supplement be labeled ``imitation'' if it is nutritionally inferior to another product forces manufacturers
to increase potencies in order that their products will not have to be labeled ``imitation.'' 
Under section 403(r)(2)(A)(ii) of the act, for a food to be labeled as ``[nutrient] free,'' the nutrient must usually
be present in the food or in a food for which it substitutes, as that term is defined by the Secretary (and by delegation,
FDA) for the food. Accordingly, the agency defined ``substitute foods'' in 101.13(d) (21 CFR 101.3(d)) in
the final rule on nutrient content claims (58 FR 2302 at 2411) for the purpose of identifying the characteristics that
substitute foods must have if they are to bear nutrient content claims that highlight differences between them and
the foods for which they substitute. The definition states that a substitute food is one that may be used interchangeably
with another food that it resembles, i.e., to which it is organoleptically, physically, and functionally (including
shelf life) similar and to which it is not nutritionally inferior, unless it is labeled as an ``imitation.'' Additionally,
101.3(e)(1) (21 CFR 101.3(e)(l)) states that a food shall be deemed to be an imitation, and thus subject to the
requirements of section 403(c) of the act, if it is a substitute for or resembles another food but is nutritionally
inferior to that food. Thus, the issue that the agency must consider is whether dietary supplements that are foods
should be subject to these provisions on substitute foods as any other foods are. 
The agency has no evidence that manufacturers will increase the potencies for their products to avoid the use of this
term and disagrees that this provision will interfere with a manufacturer's right to decide on product formulations.
It is extremely unlikely that the term ``imitation'' will ever be used on dietary supplements, particularly dietary
supplements of vitamins and minerals. The issue of whether a supplement would be an ``imitation'' would arise only
when a manufacturer chooses to make a ``free'' or ``low'' claim for sugar or sodium on a dietary supplement (see comment
4). In such circumstances, under section 403(r)(2)(A)(ii) of the act, the manufacturer must identify a product on
the market with which its product can be used interchangeably, to which the manufacturers product is not nutritionally
inferior, and that contains sodium or sugar. Such a product may include the version of the manufacturer's product
that contains sodium or sugar. As long as such a product exists, the manufacturer's product need not be labeled as an
imitation. Moreover, if because of the way the manufacturer has formulated its product, there is no product with which
it is used interchangeably, the product can be called ``______, a sodium-free food.'' Only in the rare situations
in which neither of the conditions apply would the product have to be called ``imitation'' for it to bear a ``free''
or ``low'' sodium or sugar claim.
Sections 101.13(d)(1) and (d)(2) are designed to ensure that material differences between the substitute food and
the reference food are conspicuously stated on the label or labeling of the food, so that consumers can make fully informed
judgments about the value of the substitute food and its usefulness in maintaining healthy dietary practices. If
a product has substantially less of a nutrient than the reference food, and to that extent is materially different
and inferior in nutrient content, then ``imitation'' is an entirely appropriate term. For this reason, the agency
concludes that there is no reason to apply the substitute food provisions any differently to dietary supplements
than to other foods.


2. Requirements for ``Low'' and ``Free'' Claims


4. Several comments from dietary supplement manufacturers and trade associations questioned the need to allow ``low''
and ``free'' claims for nutrients such as fat and cholesterol that are not typically found in dietary supplements.
One comment suggested that ``free,'' ``low,'' and ``reduced'' claims for calories, fat, and cholesterol on dietary
supplements should be permitted only on dietary supplements that are a significant source of calories, such as protein
supplements. The comment argued that consumers do not expect most dietary supplements to contain significant amounts
of calories, and that it is nonsensical and confusing to permit dietary supplements that are not a significant source
of calories to make a claim about reduced amounts of calories, fat, and cholesterol contained therein. Another comment
stated that Americans who consume dietary supplements do not do so because the products are ``low in fat,'' ``cholesterol
free,'' or ``low calorie,'' and that consumers are not interested in the fat content of dietary supplements. The comment
argued that consumers care about the substances in the products and the benefits that those products can have for their
health. 
In the proposal on nutrient content claims for dietary supplements, the agency requested comment on the need for extending
``free,'' ``low,'' and ``reduced'' claims to dietary supplements (58 FR 33731 at 33745). The agency has reviewed
the comments that it received and is persuaded by them that it not meaningful to allow claims about the calorie, fat
(including saturated fat), or cholesterol content of most dietary supplements. Most of these products do not contain
those nutrients, and most consumers do not expect that they do. Thus, consumers would not generally look to these products
in making dietary choices that are designed to control the amount of calories, fat, saturated fat, and cholesterol
in the foods they eat. In fact, claims about these nutrients in most dietary supplements would only serve to confuse
consumers. While it is true that FDA is requiring information about these nutrients in the nutrition label of supplements
of herbs and of other similar nutritional substances, this requirement derives mainly from the limitation on the
exemption in section 403(q)(5)(F) of the act (formerly section 403(q)(5)(E)). See the final rule on general requirements
for nutrition labeling for dietary supplements published elsewhere in this issue of the 

Federal Register

.
However, the agency recognizes that there are some dietary supplements, such as protein supplements, in which the
amount of calories in the product is significant to consumers. On these products, the source of the calories, particularly
whether they are from fat, is relevant and useful information.
Therefore, FDA has decided, based on the comments that it received to only allow calorie, fat, saturated fat, and cholesterol
claims on those dietary supplements in which the amount of calories is important to consumers. In attempting to define
what this level of calories should be, the agency looked first to 101.9(f)(1) and (j)(4), which said that a food
has ``insignificant'' calories for the purposes of nutrition labeling if it has an amount of calories that can be rounded
to zero. Section 101.9(c)(1) states that ``less than 5 calories'' per serving may be expressed as zero, the same amount
that is defined as ``calorie free.'' 
While FDA does not have information on the caloric content of dietary supplements, it would not be unreasonable to
expect that many dietary supplements contain more than 5 calories (cal) per serving, particularly children's chewable
vitamin and mineral supplements, supplements that contain herbal extracts, and supplements that contain caloric
binders and fillers. Thus, to tie the use of ``free,'' ``low,'' and ``reduced'' calorie, fat, and cholesterol claims
on labels of dietary supplements to the presence of more than an ``insignificant amount'' of calories in the food would
be over-inclusive and would allow many products in which the amount of calories is not significant to consumers to
bear such claims.
FDA next looked at the definition of ``low calorie'' in 101.60(b)(2) (21 CFR 101.60(b)(2)) for use in determining
which dietary supplements should be allowed to bear ``free,'' ``low,'' and ``reduced'' claims. Section 101.60(b)(2)
defines a ``low calorie'' food as a food that contains 40 cal or less per reference amount customarily consumed (hereinafter
referred to as reference amount) and per 50 grams (g) if the reference amount is small. FDA believes that 40 cal per reference
amount represents a reasonable level for demarcating a dietetically relevant source of calories for dietary supplements.
In a product that contains this amount of calories, the source of the calories (e.g., fat) is of significance to consumers.

Accordingly, the agency is revising 101.62(a) (21 CFR 101.62(a)) by adding paragraph (a)(4) to state that
``free,'' ``low,'' and ``reduced'' claims for fat, saturated fat, and cholesterol may not be made for dietary supplements
that meet the criteria in 101.60(b)(1) and (b)(2) for ``calorie free'' and ``low calorie'' claims. FDA is also
revising 101.13(b) by adding new paragraph (b)(5) to reflect these provisions. As a consequence, claims that
identify all products of that class of being ``low'' or ``free'' of a nutrient (e.g., ``vitamin C supplement, a fat-free
supplement'') will also be prohibited. 
However, to use the same criteria (i.e., that a product may not be ``calorie free'' or ``low calorie'') as a basis for
when a calorie claim may be made, has the effect of prohibiting the very claims that the criterion seeks to permit, namely
``calorie free'' and ``low calorie'' claims. Such a criterion would permit only relative calorie claims (e.g. ``reduced'')
on dietary supplements. Therefore, a slightly different scheme for permitting calorie claims on certain dietary
supplements, such as protein supplements, must be derived.
While, as stated above, the agency believes that calorie claims should not be permitted on most dietary supplements,
it does believe that ``calorie free'' and ``low calorie'' claims may be appropriate if an equivalent amount of a similar
food (i.e., another protein supplement) that the labeled food resembles and for which it substitutes would normally
contain an appreciable amount of calories. Such a claim would highlight that the labeled food had a different calorie
profile than would be expected in the similar product. It would also serve to direct a consumer to a product that had
a lower amount of calories. Because the food would meet the criteria for ``low calorie'' and would be so labeled, it
would not be necessary to highlight any comparative differences between the labeled and the similar food as would
be required for a relative claim.
Therefore, the agency is revising 101.62(a) by adding new paragraph (a)(4) to state that claims for calories
may not be made on labels of dietary supplements that meet the criteria in 101.60(b)(1) or (b)(2) for ``calorie
free'' and ``low calorie'' except when an equivalent amount of a similar dietary supplement (e.g., another protein
supplement) that the labeled food resembles and for which it substitutes normally exceeds the definition for ``low
calorie'' in 101.60(b)(2). It is including similar language in 101.13(b)(5). 
The comments specifically objected to claims for calories, fat, and cholesterol. Claims for sodium and sugar content
were not mentioned. Since the sugar and sodium levels in dietary supplements can vary substantially, the agency finds
that claims about the sugar and sodium content of dietary supplements may be useful in helping consumers to make purchasing
decisions that will assist them in maintaining healthy dietary practices. Thus, extending the definitions of ``low,''
``free,'' and ``reduced'' for sugar and sodium to dietary supplements is appropriate irrespective of the calorie
level of the dietary supplement. Therefore, FDA concludes that there is no need to place limitations on claims for
sugar and sodium content other than those in  101.60(c) and 101.61, respectively. As explained below,
FDA is amending these provisions to reflect their application to dietary supplements.


3. Labeling Mechanics
a. Type size 


5. In discussing type size for nutrient content claims, one comment stated that every new statement that is required
on dietary supplement labels will create a problem for manufacturers, particularly if they are constrained by minimum-type
size requirements. 
The agency acknowledges that dietary supplements are frequently packaged in small containers, and for this reason,
FDA specifically asked for information on the impact of the type size proposal on dietary supplements that are packaged
in small containers (58 FR 33731 at 33734). No suggestions or examples were presented to assist the agency in deciding
how to address this problem. Therefore, the agency has made no special provision for dietary supplements in the type
size requirements for nutrient content claims. FDA discusses the type size requirements for the nutrition labeling
of dietary supplements in the final rule on nutrition labeling of dietary supplements published elsewhere in this
issue of the 

Federal Register

.
FDA stated in the technical corrections document (58 FR 44020 at 44020 and 44021) that there was a need to specify the
minimum type size for labeling information (e.g., accompanying information) required under the nutrient content
claims regulation. As a result, the agency modified 101.2(b) to include 101.13, 101.54, 101.56,
101.60, 101.61, 101.62, and 101.65 in the list of sections set out in 101.2(b) for which a minimum type size for
required label information is specified. For consistency, the agency also modified 101.2(f) to include 101.13,
101.54, 101.56, 101.60, 101.61, 101.62, and 101.65.The effect of these revisions for dietary supplements is that
label information required by the nutrient content claims regulations, but whose type size is not otherwise specified,
will be required to be in letters or numbers no less than one-sixteenth of an inch in height unless otherwise specified
by 101.2(c). FDA believes that making nutrient content claims on dietary supplements subject to this requirement
is appropriate because this requirement is the logical outgrowth of the proposal. In the proposal on nutrient content
claims for dietary supplements, FDA raised the issue of how to make nutrient content claims on dietary supplements.
The question of how to ensure the legibility of the referral statement, which is required by section 403(r)(2)(B)
of the act, is one that is at least implicitly raised by this issue. Thus, the agency's decision to explicitly address
the question of the type size of the referral statement in this final rule represents the logical outgrowth of issues
that were raised in the proposal. 
The agency pointed out in the technical corrections document that if there are circumstances in which the product
is not able to comply with type size requirements, manufacturers may request an alternative means of compliance (e.g.,
permission to use a reduced type size) in accordance with  101.9(g)(9). Section 101.9(g)(9) states that when
it is not technologically feasible, or some other circumstance makes it impracticable, for firms to comply with nutrition
labeling requirements, they may write to the Office of Food Labeling, Food and Drug Administration, and request an
alternative means of compliance. For the reasons explained above, dietary supplements of herbs and other similar
nutritional substances are appropriately subject to this provision even though it was not specifically set out in
the proposal on nutrient content claims for dietary supplements. A similar provision is included in 101.36(d)(2)
of the final regulation for nutrition labeling for dietary supplements of vitamins and minerals, in a companion document
in this issue of the 

Federal Register

. These provisions allow flexibility to ensure that there will be either sufficient space to make nutrient content
claims on the labels of dietary supplements, or that manufacturers will have recourse to request relief.


b. Disclosure levels


6. One comment stated that there are a certain number of products, such as chewable tablets containing sodium ascorbate,
for which information on sodium might be useful to consumers in maintaining healthy diets. The comment suggested
that the agency urge supplement manufacturers to include information on sodium content, even though the sodium level
might not reach the threshold levels established in 101.13(h)(1) that would trigger a required statement.
The agency disagrees that there is a sufficient basis for requiring either the declaration of total sodium content
on the principal display panel of a dietary supplement or for requiring a referral statement directing the consumer
to the nutrition label for information about sodium content on all dietary supplements. Section 101.13(h)(1) specifies
that the referral statement (i.e., ``See [appropriate panel] for information about [nutrient requiring disclosure]
and other nutrients'') is required only when the sodium (or fat, saturated fat, or cholesterol) content of a product
exceeds the disclosure level. FDA finds that there is no reason to provide a different rule for dietary supplements.
To the extent, as the comment suggests, that information on sodium content would be useful, it will be provided on the
nutrition label as long as it is present at more than an insignificant level. Section 101.36(b)(3), which lists the
nutrients that must be included in the nutrition label of a dietary supplement of a vitamin or mineral, provides that
all nutrients listed in 101.9(c), including sodium, must be declared on the nutrition label of a dietary supplement
of vitamins and minerals, except that nutrients present at levels that would be declared as zero shall not be declared.
(For sodium, the amount that is declared as zero is less than 5 milligrams (mg) per serving.) Section 101.9(c) itself
requires that sodium be listed on the nutrition label of other dietary supplements. Consumers thus will be able to
readily find the amount of sodium in a product by examining the nutrition label. Because the comment provided no basis
for its suggestion other than usefulness, FDA is not making any special provision for the declaration of sodium on
dietary supplements.


4. Relative Claims, Reference Foods, ``Modified''


7. One comment requested that the agency clarify in 101.13(j) that for dietary supplements, the reference
food may be a source of the nutrient in either a dissimilar food within a product category or a similar food. The comment
stated that the most helpful information to a consumer purchasing a dietary supplement often may be a comparison of
the vitamin or mineral content to a recognized source of the nutrient, e.g., ``contains more vitamin C than two 8 oz
glasses of orange juice.'' In addition, the comment maintained that the examples used in the proposed rule on nutrient
content claims for dietary supplements (58 FR 33731 at 33737) for comparing dissimilar foods within the same product
category (e.g., potato chips as a reference for pretzels) generally does not apply to dietary supplements. 
The agency agrees that a clarification is warranted to reinforce that 101.13(j) applies to dietary supplements
as well as to foods in conventional food form. Section 101.13(j)(1)(i)(A) states that for ``less'' (or ``fewer'')
and ``more'' claims, the reference food may be a dissimilar food within a product category that can generally be substituted
for one another in the diet (e.g., potato chips as reference for pretzels) or a similar food (e.g., potato chips as reference
for potato chips). 
The agency agrees that adding examples that are specific for dietary supplements will clarify that for ``less'' (or
``fewer'') and ``more'' claims, the reference food may be a dissimilar food within a product category for which the
labeled food can generally be substituted (e.g., orange juice as a reference for vitamin C tablet) or a similar food
(e.g., one brand of multivitamin as a reference for another brand of multivitamin). Accordingly, the agency is revising
101.13(j)(1)(i)(A) to include these examples.
Additionally, to clarify 101.13(j)(1)(i)(B) for ``light,'' ``reduced,'' ``added,'' ``fortified,'' and
``enriched'' claims, the agency is revising this regulation to include an example of a reference food that is a similar
food (e.g., one brand of multivitamin for another brand of multivitamin).
8. One comment agreed that the term ``modified'' would rarely be a useful term for vitamin/mineral supplements but
stated that this term might be useful for certain dietary supplements that contain ``other similar nutritional substances.''
The comment stated that there are techniques for concentrating certain fish oils that are high in omega-3 fatty acids.
The comment suggested that the use of the term ``modified'' might serve to distinguish products containing the concentrated
fish oils from other fish oil products that would have to be taken several times a day to provide the same amount of fish
oil and thus result in the consumption of significantly more calories. The comment argued that use of the term ``modified''
on dietary supplements should be authorized to maintain the principle of consistency between foods in conventional
food form and dietary supplements.
The agency agrees. FDA has defined ``modified'' for use as part of the statement of identity on foods to reflect the
fact that a change has been made in a food (56 FR 60421 at 60454). The term is not to be used alone, nor is the term to be used
to describe products that have not been altered (58 FR 2302 at 2367 and 2412). Based on the comment, the agency concludes
that this term may have some limited usefulness for dietary supplements, and thus this term may be used on such products
when they meet the conditions of 101.13(k). FDA finds, however, that no change in 101.13(k) is necessary
to authorize this use of the term.


5. Reference Amounts 


9. One comment stated that if comparative claims (e.g., ``reduced sodium'') were to be made for dietary supplements,
there need to be reference amounts (i.e., reference amounts customarily consumed) established so that one product
recommending consumption of, for example, one tablespoon (tbsp) per day is not compared to a product recommending
five tbsp per day. The comment argued that the proposal allows very flexible reference amounts for supplements (i.e.,
whatever the manufacturer is recommending for consumption) and suggests that reference amounts of reference foods
(as established in 101.13(j)) be specified in more concrete terms.
The agency is not persuaded by the comment that more concrete terms are needed for reference amounts at this time. The
agency has established in the final rule on general requirements for nutrition labeling for dietary supplements
published elsewhere in this issue of the 

Federal Register

 a definition for the reference amount customarily consumed for dietary supplements in 101.12(b) as ``the
maximum amount recommended on the label for consumption per eating occasion or, in the absence of recommendations,
1 tablet, capsule, packet, or teaspoonful, as appropriate.'' This definition is based on comments received on the
proposal for mandatory nutrition labeling for dietary supplements.
Section 101.13(p)(1), which FDA proposed to apply to dietary supplements, states that unless otherwise specified,
the reference amount customarily consumed set forth in 101.12(b) through (f) shall be used in determining
whether a product meets the criteria for a nutrient content claim. The comment did not suggest an alternative to the
reference amount that could be used as the basis for comparative claims for dietary supplements. Therefore, given
the fact, as the agency said in the proposal on nutrient content claims for dietary supplements (58 FR 33731 at 33732),
that a consistent approach to nutrient content claims on dietary supplements and on foods in conventional food form
will increase consumers' ability to use and understand such claims, FDA is not adopting a different approach to comparative
claims for dietary supplements than the one that it adopted for foods in conventional food form.
The agency acknowledges that there is a potential for unfair marketing and misleading claims if the serving size is
manipulated upwards or downwards to enable a product to make a nutrient content claim. The agency retains the authority
to regulate any such misleading claims under section 403(a) of the act. Issues concerning serving size are further
discussed in the companion document on nutrition labeling for dietary supplements, published elsewhere in this
issue of the 

Federal Register

.


IV. Definitions for Specific Nutrient Content Claim Terms


A. Use of RDI's and DRV's in Formulating Definitions


10. Many comments stated that limiting nutrient content claims to those nutrients with RDI's or DRV's was unnecessarily
restrictive. Several comments suggested that content claims should be authorized with respect to a nutrient as long
as it has either an RDI or DRV as established by FDA in 101.9(c) or a Recommended Dietary Allowance (RDA) as established
by the National Academy of Sciences (NAS) (Ref. 4). Other comments also stated that nutrient content claims should
be authorized for nutrients for which NAS has established Estimated Safe and Adequate Daily Dietary Intakes (ESADDI's).
Other comments suggested that FDA should expand the number of vitamins and minerals with RDI's when it publishes the
final RDI/DRV rule following the expiration of the DS act moratorium. 
FDA agrees that the current list of RDI's does not represent the entire list of nutrients for which dietary recommendations
have been established. The agency had proposed to establish RDI's for all nutrients for which RDA's or ESADDI's were
provided in the 1989 edition of the NAS RDA's (56 FR 60366). However, under the DS act, the agency was constrained to
retain the label reference values established in 101.9(c)(8)(iv) until at least November 8, 1993. These values
were based on the 1968 RDA's. The 1968 RDA's did not contain recommended dietary values for a number of nutrients for
which NAS has subsequently provided RDA's or ESADDI's. RDA's for vitamin K and selenium were established subsequent
to 1968 and are listed in the 1989 edition of the NAS RDA's (Ref. 4). Furthermore, the 1980 and 1989 editions of the NAS
RDA's provided ESADDI's for chloride, manganese, fluoride, chromium, and molybdenum. Now that the moratorium established
by the DS act has expired, the agency is proposing elsewhere in this issue of the 

Federal Register

 to establish RDI's for all nutrients for which RDA's or ESADDI's are provided in the 1980 and 1989 editions of the NAS's
Recommended Dietary Allowances but for which RDI's or DRV's have not been established by FDA. Once RDI's are established
for these additional seven nutrients, nutrient content claims may be made for them. 
FDA intends to consider revising all of the RDI's to conform to the most recent levels established by NAS. However,
FDA is aware that NAS is in the process of reevaluating the basis on which RDA's are determined. It is considering the
issue of whether values should be selected to prevent deficiencies or to promote optimal wellness. The agency believes
that its action should await completion of the NAS process. FDA is committed to working with NAS to help resolve this
issue.
Accordingly, as stated in response to comment number 1 above, FDA has concluded that it is not possible to define nutrient
content claims for nutrients for which no reliable reference standards such as the RDI's and DRV's have been established.
The agency believes that authorization for nutrient content claims for nutrients for which no RDI or DRV exists (e.g.,
vitamin K) needs to be deferred until RDI's or DRV's are adopted. In the interim, quantitative nutrient information
may be listed in the nutrition label as discussed in the final rule on general requirements for nutrition labeling
for dietary supplements published elsewhere in this issue of the 

Federal Register

. 
Also, manufacturers may provide amount or percentage statements as described in 101.13(i)(3) for those nutrients
that do not have RDI's or DRV's. For example, while there is no RDI for fluoride, under this provision, manufacturers
may declare the amount of the nutrient present (e.g., 2 mg fluoride) on any panel outside of the Nutrition Facts box.

11. One comment stated that claims should be permitted for 

beta

-carotene.
The agency believes that claims regarding 

beta

-carotene (e.g., ``contains 

beta

-carotene'') are claims about an ingredient that make implied representations about the level of vitamin A that is
present in the food as 

beta

-carotene. This conclusion is consistent with section 403(r)(1)(A) of the act, which states that a food can be misbranded
by a statement that expressly or by implication characterizes the level of a nutrient in a food. The agency considers
that the claim ``contains 

beta

-carotene'' implies that there is enough 

beta

-carotene in the food to constitute a ``good source'' of vitamin A (i.e., it contains 10 percent or more of the DV for
vitamin A from 

beta

-carotene). Such a claim is provided for in 101.65(c).
12. One comment advocated defining nutrient content claims for ultratrace nutrients including boron, silicon,
vanadium, arsenic, and tin. The comment stated that claims about these ultratrace elements should be permitted on
the basis of the RDA, ESADDI, or the amounts found in the average well-balanced diet. Additionally, this comment argued
that reference values should be available for ultratrace nutrients once reputable scientific evidence is established
that such nutrients serve important metabolic or physiological functions in the body. The comment also suggested
that label information be permitted for choline and inositol.
The agency disagrees. The trace elements arsenic, nickel, silicon, boron, cadmium, lead, lithium, tin, vanadium,
and cobalt, as well as choline and inositol, have not been shown to be essential in humans. No RDA's or ESADDI's for these
substances have been established by NAS. NAS states that several of these substances ``naturally present in foods
are known to be required in the diets of various animal or microbial species, but there is little or no evidence of their
dietary essentiality for humans'' (Ref. 4). While NAS acknowledges that some of these classes of substances may ``one
day be candidates for RDA's,'' it states that there is currently no evidence that these substances are essential in
humans (Ref. 4). 
As stated in the ``Summary'' section of the 10th edition of the NAS RDA publication (Ref. 4), the NAS RDA's are based
not only on data from nutrient intake measurements but also on information from nutrient balance studies, experimental
intake studies, biochemical measurements, epidemiological observations of nutrient status, and extrapolation
of data from animal experiments. FDA does not agree with the comments that it is desirable to base label reference values
for nutrient content claims solely on individual scientific research publications, no matter how current, or solely
on data on amounts of the trace element found in well-balanced diets. The existence of such data does not mean that there
is scientific agreement on the essentiality of the nutrient or on the recommended level in the diet. Should agreement
on the essentiality of additional nutrients be reached, timely and appropriate changes to the label reference values
can be made through FDA's rulemaking procedures.
However, as stated above, manufacturers are free to declare the amount of the trace elements, or choline or inositol,
on the product label outside of the ``Nutrition Facts'' panel in accordance with 101.13(i)(3). Such a statement
of amount is not considered to characterize the level of the nutrient in the food, as would claims such as ``high'' or
``more.''
13. One comment stated that although no RDI's have been established for certain vitamins and minerals, nutrient content
claims could be based on reference foods that are recognized sources of those nutrients. For example, the label could
state that ``Brand X provides more vitamin K than two servings of cabbage,'' based on the vitamin K content of the reference
amount for vegetables without sauce listed in 101.12, Table 2. 
The agency disagrees. Until a reference standard is established there is no basis for confidence that cabbage is a
good source of vitamin K. There is also no basis for confidence that the amount of vitamin K in the food that is to be the
subject of the claim is nutritionally significant. Elsewhere in this issue of the 

Federal Register

, the agency has proposed to expand the list of nutrients with RDI's, including vitamin K. At this time, however, FDA
concludes that it would be premature to authorize such claims.


B. Specific Requirements for Nutrient Content Claims (21 CFR 101, Subpart D)_Applicability to Dietary Supplements


1. 101.54 Nutrient Content Claims for ``Good Source,'' ``high,'' and ``More'' 
a. ``Good source'' and ``high'' 


14. One comment encouraged the agency to maintain the proposed definitions for ``good source'' and ``high'' for dietary
supplements. The comment argued that a higher level (e.g., 40 percent of the RDI) would suggest to consumers that daily
nutrient intakes could be achieved by consuming only a few foods, which is inconsistent with dietary guidelines.
The comment maintained that if a new higher claim level was adopted for supplements, it would likely also apply to foods
in conventional food form based on the logic of the proposal for nutrient content claims for dietary supplements (i.e.,
consistency in definitions). The comment stated that users of dietary supplements are well aware of the elevated
nutrient levels in these products, and that a new paradigm is not needed to inform consumers of these levels. 
On the other hand, several comments did not support the proposal to use the same definitions for ``good source'' and
``high'' claims as those used for foods in conventional food form. The comments argued that the terms ``good source''
and ``high'' should not carry the same meaning for supplements as for foods in conventional food form, that most supplements
contain at least 100 percent of the Daily Value for most of the nutrients they provide, and that consumers expect most
of these products to contain at least 100 percent of the Daily Value. The comments maintained that allowing any product
with as little as 10 or 20 percent of the RDI to carry ``good source'' and ``high'' claims would confuse and mislead consumers.

One comment questioned whether it is appropriate to permit the use of these nutrient content claims on vitamins and
mineral supplements since it implies that supplements are comparable to, and acceptable substitutes for, foods
in conventional food form. The comment also noted that nutrition educators feel strongly that supplements can enhance
the nutrient intake from foods in conventional food form but can never replace them since foods in conventional food
form provides other important components. On the other hand, many comments supported the proposal to extend the same
definitions for ``good source'' and ``high'' for foods in conventional food form to dietary supplements. These comments
emphasized the importance of consistency in definitions to assist consumer education.
One comment requested clarification on whether the terms ``good source'' and ``contains'' will be permitted for
dietary supplements. The comment maintained that such claims provide consumers with important information regarding
the precise content of various nutrients and should not be subject to discriminatory treatment solely on the basis
of whether such claims are made for a nutrient in a dietary supplement as opposed to one in a conventional food.
The agency has reviewed these comments and is not persuaded that the definition of the terms ``good source'' and ``high''
should be different for dietary supplements than for foods in conventional food form. The agency finds that the definitions
for foods in conventional food form and dietary supplements should be consistent. As directed by the 1990 amendments
(section 3(b)(1)(A)(iii)(VI)), FDA defined the term ``high,'' and the synonyms ``rich in'' and ``excellent source
of,'' for use on labels and in labeling in 101.54 (58 FR 2302 at 2344). In 101.54(c)(1) of final rule on
nutrient content claims, the agency stated that the term ``good source'' may be used to describe a food when a serving
of the food contains 10 to 19 percent of the RDI or the DRV for a nutrient. Likewise, the agency stated that the term ``high''
may be used to describe a food when a serving contains 20 percent or more of the RDI or the DRV. FDA concluded that the use
of these terms would permit a sufficient number of food items to bear ``good source'' and ``high'' claims to allow consumers
to use the claims in selecting foods that are better sources of nutrients (58 FR 2344). 
While FDA recognizes that under the present definitions, most, if not all, dietary supplements of vitamins, minerals,
potassium, and fiber would qualify for ``good source'' or ``high'' claims, the agency does not agree with those comments
that argued that the definitions, as proposed, would be confusing or misleading to consumers. As suggested by the
IOM report on nutrition labeling (Ref. 6), the use of consistent and targeted content claims increases consumers'
confidence in the validity of the claim. FDA is aware of no evidence to support an alternate conclusion. The basic principle
of consistency in definitions of nutrient content claims is discussed in detail in comment 2 of this document. 
Furthermore, the agency recognizes that consumers expect dietary supplements to be concentrated sources of nutrients.
Consumer studies support this conclusion (Refs. 1 and 5). FDA acknowledges that the terms ``good source'' and ``high''
might be of limited utility in comparing nutrient content among dietary supplements of vitamins and minerals because
virtually the entire class of products would qualify for such claims. However, these terms may be useful for some single
source dietary supplements of calcium, biotin, or fiber or for multinutrient preparations containing these nutrients.
These nutrients are generally found in dietary supplements at levels below the Daily Value. 
Additionally, FDA believes that these terms would be useful in highlighting the nutrient content of some herbs and
other similar nutritional substances that have nutrients at levels high enough to qualify for the definition of one
of the above terms. For these reasons, the agency is not persuaded to preclude the use of these terms for dietary supplements.

The agency agrees with the comment that stated that dietary supplements cannot replace foods in conventional food
form in all respects because the latter foods supply other important components. However, FDA recognizes that dietary
supplements can be a useful part of the diet for those who wish to make sure that they consume at least the RDI amount for
all vitamins and minerals or for those who wish to increase their daily intake of a particular substance above those
levels that are ordinarily available from conventional foods. Thus, FDA finds that use of these terms on dietary supplements
is appropriate.
FDA is convinced that consistency in definitions of nutrient content claims across the food supply is necessary.
Consistency facilitates consumer education by limiting the number of terms that the public must learn and interpret.
Moreover, different definitions for the same terms for dietary supplements and foods in conventional food form would
be confusing to consumers because of the difficulties inherent in learning alternate definitions for the same term.
There is a greater chance of error and misinterpretation when several definitions must be learned for the same term.
Thus, different definitions would likely do more harm than good. Accordingly, the agency concludes that the proposed
definitions for ``good source'' and ``high'' are appropriate, and that there is no reason to define the terms differently
for dietary supplements. 
The agency would like to clarify that ``good source'' and ``contains'' as defined 101.54(c)(1) are nutrient
content claims that can be used for foods in conventional food form as well as for dietary supplements. There is nothing
in this final rule that states that the use of these terms would not be allowed for dietary supplements.
15. One comment stated that under FDA's proposal, consumers who want truly high levels_that is, levels that exceed
the RDI_would have no means of identifying those products, other than reading the fine print on the back of each supplement
label. 
The comment acknowledged that consumers might also be confused if ``high'' had one meaning when the claim appears
on labels of dietary supplements and a different meaning when the claim appears on labels of foods in conventional
food form. To avoid that inconsistency, the comment urged FDA to prohibit the claims ``good source'' and ``high''
on supplements. Further, the comment suggested that the agency should define the term ``high potency'' and allow
it to be used only on supplements. 
FDA disagrees that the terms ``good source'' and ``high'' should be prohibited on the labels of dietary supplements.
The agency recognizes that a claim of ``high'' will not specifically identify those products that have levels of nutrients
that exceed the RDI. However, the quantitative amount of a nutrient in a dietary supplement is often a part of the statement
of identity for the product, and additional quantitative information regarding the level of a nutrient may also be
found in amount or percentage statements on the principal display panel. In addition, as a result of the agency's new
format requirements, the nutrition label for dietary supplements of vitamins and minerals provides quantitative
information on the levels of specific nutrients as well as the percent DV for each nutrient in a more legible format.
Consequently, consumers will have easy access to information regarding the levels of specific nutrients and may
adjust their levels of intake accordingly.
Further, as discussed in the previous comment, while the terms ``good source'' and ``high'' may be of limited utility
for dietary supplements of vitamins and minerals, these terms may be useful in highlighting the nutritional content
of single nutrients, such as biotin and calcium, that are generally found in products at levels well below the RDI,
as well as of dietary supplements of herbs and other similar nutritional products. Therefore, FDA concludes that
precluding the use of these terms on dietary supplements is unjustified. 
However, FDA believes that there is a sufficient basis to consider defining the term ``high potency'' or some similar
term as a nutrient content claim. FDA's tentative view is that this term, or a similar term when defined, could provide
a way for manufacturers to describe the higher levels of nutrients in dietary supplements. (See comment 25 for further
discussion of this matter.) 


b. ``More'' 


16. One comment stated that consumers could be misled if comparative claims are made among high potency vitamin/mineral
supplements. The comment stated that if, for example, one brand of 300-mg vitamin B6 tablets claimed that it contained
``more'' than a competitive 250-mg product, then the consumer may get the misleading impression that the former product
is better. The comment maintained that as customers shop for supplements, they will be able to readily observe whether
one product is more potent than another without label claims suggesting superiority of one over another. If such a
claim resulted in better sales, then a ``horsepower race'' would ensue. The comment recommended that ``more'' claims
for vitamins and minerals not be allowed if the nutrient potency of the reference product already meets or exceeds
100 percent of the Daily Value. 
The agency acknowledges that there is the possibility that some manufacturers may choose to increase potencies in
order to make a ``more'' claim in comparison to another brand, but the agency disagrees that the limitation suggested
by the comment is warranted at this time. The agency points out that ``more'' claims for nutrients with an RDI or DRV,
including those products with nutrients in megadoses, such as those in the example cited by the comment, must include
the following information: The percentage (or fraction) that the nutrient was increased relative to the RDI or DRV,
the identity of the reference food, and the quantitative amount of the nutrient present (e.g., contains ``20 percent
more of the DV for vitamin B6 per tablet than product `x'. The vitamin B6 content of product `x' is 250 mg. This product
contains 300 mg vitamin B6.'') The nutrition label of a product containing 300 mg of vitamin B6 must state that the product
contains 1,500 percent of the Daily Value. The agency acknowledges that the amount of information required to make
a ``more'' claim is considerable, but such information is necessary to allow consumers to readily see how the amount
of a nutrient for which a ``more'' claim is made fits into the total daily diet. Furthermore, FDA believes that the concern
regarding ``horsepower races'' in dietary supplements stems from concerns of possible unfair marketing among manufacturers
as well as from safety concerns inherent in the addition of very high levels of nutrients to supplements. Similar concerns
with foods in conventional food form led to the establishment of FDA's fortification policy in 1980. This policy,
while published in 104.20, does not have the force of a regulation. However, the agency has not found evidence
of widespread ``horsepower races'' with such foods. The agency urges industry, particularly industry associations,
to develop standards regarding nutrient levels and to monitor compliance with those standards to minimize any safety
problems. 


c. Restrictions on label or labeling claims based on section 411(b)(2)(B) of the act


17. One comment from a trade association stated that the literal reading of section 411(b)(2)(B) of the act prohibits
giving prominence on the label of dietary supplements of vitamins or minerals to ingredients that are not vitamins
or minerals. The comment argued that these prohibitions result in the withholding of information that is of interest
to consumers, and that it is increasingly common for manufacturers to market products that offer a combination of
vitamins, minerals, herbs, and other dietary substances. The comment stated that the principal reason for the purchase
of these products is not their vitamin and mineral content but the other ingredients. The comment invited FDA to join
the supplement industry in seeking an amendment to section 411 of the act that will remedy this problem. 
Another comment disagreed with FDA's interpretation of section 411(b)(2)(B) of the act and suggested that this section
merely prohibits giving prominence or emphasis to such ingredients. The comment argued that nutrients other than
vitamins and minerals or sources of vitamins and minerals should be permitted to appear outside or immediately following
the nutrition label, providing that such information is not emphasized by, for example, being presented in type size
greater than that used in the nutrition label. The comment stated that such limited declarations would not conflict
with current provisions of the act and would be fair and reasonable means of communicating about the presence of ingredients
that provide added value to many dietary supplement products.
The agency is persuaded by these comments that a clarification of those sections of the proposal relating to section
411(b)(2)(B) of the act is needed. Section 411(b)(2)(B) of the act states that the labeling and advertising for dietary
supplements of vitamins and minerals may not give prominence to or emphasize ingredients that are not vitamins, minerals,
or represented as a source of vitamins or minerals. Because of this provision, nutrient content claims about ingredients
that are not vitamins or minerals (e.g., ``more fiber,'' ``high protein'') may not be made on dietary supplements
of vitamins or minerals. 
It must be emphasized that this provision pertains only to dietary supplements of vitamins and minerals. If, for example,
an herbal extract includes vitamins and minerals but is labeled as an herbal extract, in compliance with 101.9
and other applicable provisions, and is advertised as such, section 411(b)(2)(B) of the act would not apply. The same
is true for a product that is primarily a protein supplement. A protein supplement with added vitamins and minerals
that is labeled and advertised as a protein supplement could declare that it is high in fiber. Such claims are permissible
as long as they are made in accordance with section 403(r) of the act, and they are not false or misleading in any particular.

However, section 411(b)(2)(B) of the act makes clear that in the labeling and advertising of dietary supplements
of vitamins and minerals, ingredients other than vitamins or minerals cannot be emphasized or given prominence.
FDA interprets prominence not solely as a function of type size. Declaring an ingredient outside or immediately following
the nutrition label is another means of giving prominence. For example, a statement such as ``5 g psyllium,'' except
in extremely limited circumstances, cannot be made on the principal display panel, outside the nutrition label,
or immediately following the nutrition label of a dietary supplement of vitamins and minerals because such placements
give prominence to that ingredient. However, the declaration of psyllium in the ingredient list would not be construed
as giving prominence to that ingredient. On the other hand, ``5 g psyllium'' could be declared in an amount statement
on the principal display panel, outside, or immediately following the nutrition label on protein supplements, on
dietary supplements of herbal extracts, and on dietary supplements of other similar nutritional substances so long
as these dietary supplements are not subject to section 411 of the act.
FDA advises that if a sugar is an ingredient in a dietary supplement of vitamins or minerals, claims about the amount
of sugar actually in the product would have to be restricted. However, ``sugar-free'' and ``no added sugar'' are absence
claims that assert that sugar is not an ingredient. The agency concludes that the use of these terms is acceptable on
dietary supplements of vitamins or minerals, as well as on other types of dietary supplements.
In view of this clarification, the agency believes that section 411(b)(2)(B) of the act, as written, is sufficiently
flexible to accommodate claims on products that are not dietary supplements of vitamins or minerals. FDA believes
that it is therefore unnecessary to amend section 411 of the act. 


2. Nutrient Content Claims for Sugar Content


18. One comment questioned the appropriateness of allowing ``sugar-free'' claims for a dietary supplement containing
less than 0.5 g of sugars. The comment stated that many supplements come in capsules or tablets that weigh slightly
less or not much more than 0.5 g, and therefore, supplements that are mostly sugars could use the term ``sugar-free.''
The comment suggested that the term ``sugar free'' on a dietary supplement should mean a much lower amount of sugars,
or that the product should be totally devoid of sugars. 
The comment also argued that terms such as ``negligible source of sugar,'' ``dietarily insignificant source of sugar,''
and ``trivial source of sugar'' are not synonymous with ``sugar-free'' because such terms connote the presence of
some sugar content. 
FDA is not persuaded by the comment that 0.5 g or less of sugars per serving is an inappropriate definition of insignificance
for sugars for dietary supplements. Section 101.60(c)(1) provides that for a food in conventional food form to make
a ``sugar free'' claim, the food must contain less than 0.5 g of sugars per reference amount. Less than 0.5 g of sugars
per reference amount is an amount that is consistent with the agency's policy of defining ``free'' claims at or near
the reliable limit of detection and in an amount that is dietetically inconsequential (56 FR 60421 at 60432). As a result,
even frequent consumption of a food bearing a ``sugar free'' claim would not result in an intake of sugars that would
affect the overall diet in any meaningful way. 
FDA acknowledges that there may be situations in which a dietary supplement may contain a significant proportion
of sugars on a weight basis and be able to make the claim ``sugar free.'' The agency believes, however, that even in such
instances, if the total amount of sugars in a serving of the product is less than 0.5 g, its net contribution to the total
daily diet would be inconsequential. 
Additionally, FDA considers it important that nutrient content claims correspond with the nutrition label, which
serves as a source of specific information for consumers concerning the nutritional value of the food. The nutrition
labeling regulations allow foods containing less than 0.5 g sugars per labeled serving to declare 0 g of sugars (101.9(c)(6)(ii)
and 101.36(b)(3)). 
FDA rejects the suggestion that it permit use of the term ``sugar free'' only where there is an absolute absence of sugars.
FDA believes that it is appropriate to apply the term ``free'' to a nutrient when a food contains that nutrient in a dietetically
trivial or physiologically inconsequential amount, even though the nutrient is present at a level at or near its reliable
limit of quantitation, because with modern analytical methods, the level at which the presence of a nutrient may be
quantified is becoming increasingly smaller (58 FR 2302 at 2320). The agency believes that it is appropriate to focus
on dietary insignificance, and very trivial amounts have no impact on the diet for the purpose of defining ``sugar
free.''
The agency also disagrees that the terms ``negligible source of sugar,'' ``dietarily insignificant source of sugar'',
and ``trivial source of sugar'' are inappropriate synonyms for ``sugar free.'' Section 403(r)(2)(A)(i) of the act
states that a nutrient content claim must be defined by regulation. In addition, section (3)(b)(1)(A)(ix) of the
1990 amendments provides that those regulations may include similar terms commonly understood to have the same meaning.
The agency is not aware of any reason why the above terms are inappropriate synonyms for ``sugar free.'' Although these
synonyms do not convey the absolute absence of sugar, they reflect that the amounts are dietetically trivial and of
no dietary significance. Therefore, the agency rejects this comment.
 19. One comment stated that the term ``no added sugar'' can be used only when a product is expected to contain sugar,
but that consumers do not know when supplements are expected to contain sugars. The comments suggested that FDA should
not preclude the use of the term ``no added sugars'' as this term would be useful to consumers in identifying those products
without sugar.
The agency is persuaded that a review of the conditions for the use of the term ``no added sugar'' is warranted. FDA did
not propose to preclude the use of the term ``no added sugar'' on all dietary supplements. The agency finds that this
term is appropriate for some dietary supplements, such as children's chewable vitamins, that are frequently sweetened.
Section 101.60(c)(2) states that the terms ``no added sugar,'' ``without added sugar,'' or ``no sugar added'' may
be used only if: (1) No amount of sugars, as defined in 101.9(c)(6)(ii), or any ingredient that contains sugars,
or that functionally substitutes for added sugars is added during processing or packaging, (2) the product does not
contain an ingredient containing added sugars, (3) the sugars content has not been increased above the amount present
in the ingredients by some means such as the use of enzymes, (4) the food that it resembles and for which it substitutes
normally is formulated with sugars, and (5) the product bears a statement that the food is not ``low calorie'' or ``calorie
reduced'' (unless the food meets the requirements for a ``low'' or ``reduced calorie'' food) and that directs consumers'
attention to the nutrition label for further information on sugar and calorie content. 
As is the case for foods in conventional food form, the agency believes that to avoid misleading consumers, the term
``no added sugar'' should be limited to dietary supplements that would be expected to contain added sugars. The agency
advises that the purpose of a ``no added sugar'' claim is to identify a food that differs from a similar food because
it does not contain the added sugars that would normally be present in the similar food. For this provision to be of practical
benefit to consumers, it must preclude the use of the claim on a food where the sugars that are normally added are replaced
with an ingredient that contains sugars that functionally substitute for the added sugars. Thus, the agency concludes
that the use of any ingredient that contains sugars that would normally be added to a food precludes the use of the ``no
added sugar'' nutrient content claim. The agency believes that claims concerning the absence of added sugars on products
that would not normally contain added sugar (e.g., dietary supplements of vitamins and minerals for adults) are likely
to mislead consumers into thinking that a particular brand may be more desirable when compared to other brands of the
same product. 
FDA acknowledges that consumers may not know every type of product that could be expected to contain sugar. However,
the final rule on nutrition labeling for dietary supplements published elsewhere in this issue of the 

Federal Register

 specifies that sugars will be listed in the ingredient label and must be declared in the nutrition label if present
in more than insignificant amounts. Through these provisions the consumer can readily ascertain which products
contain sugars.


C. Implied Nutrient Content Claims


1. Claims That are not Nutrient Content Claims


Section 101.65(b)(1) of the final rule on nutrient content claims provides that statements that declare the absence
of food components or ingredients that are not nutrients of the type required to be declared on the nutrition label,
and that are intended to facilitate avoidance for such reasons as food intolerance (e.g., lactose free), religious
beliefs, dietary practices such as vegetarianism or other nonnutrition related reason, (e.g., ``100 percent milk
free''), are not nutrient content claims. In the proposal on nutrient content claims for dietary supplements, the
agency tentatively concluded that this paragraph is applicable to dietary supplements and requested comment on
other examples that are appropriate for dietary supplements.
20. Comments suggested that other examples of terms in this category include the following: gluten free, wheat free,
corn free, yeast free, starch free, milk free, egg free, soy free, no artificial ingredients, nonirradiated, and
no synthetic ingredients. The comments requested that FDA confirm that these statements are allowed on the label.

None of the terms that were submitted in the comments other than ``egg free'' would constitute nutrient content claims.
The term ``egg free'' can be interpreted as an implied claim about cholesterol. 
The agency points out that it does not currently have a definition for ``artificial'' except as that term applies to
flavors and colors. Similarly, it has no definition for ``synthetic'' except as that term applies to flavors and colors.
Although these terms have not been defined by FDA, the agency believes that they are not nutrient content claims unless
they are used in a context in which they explicitly or implicitly describe the level of a nutrient. However, even if
these terms are not nutrient content claims, manufacturers who use them must make sure that their use is not false or
misleading. 
21. FDA proposed to include dietary supplements in the coverage of 101.65(b)(4). This section states that
when an ingredient constitutes essentially 100 percent of a food, so that the name of the ingredient is the statement
of identity, the name of the ingredient generally does not constitute an implied nutrient content claim unless it
is used in a context to suggest that a nutrient is absent or present in a certain amount. FDA used a statement of identity
for a dietary supplement in which an ingredient constitutes essentially 100 percent of a supplement (e.g. ``60 mg_vitamin
C'') as an example. One comment pointed out that 60 mg vitamin C tablets contain excipients (fillers, binders, lubricants,
disintegrants) other than vitamin C. The comment requested clarification as to whether, in the example of vitamin
C tablets, 101.65(b)(4) requires that the amount claimed in the statement of identity constitute 100 percent
of the claimed amount of a food in 101.65(b)(4). 
In the example added to 101.65(b)(4), the amount refers to the claimed nutrient. A tablet stating ``60 mg_vitamin
C tablets'' should contain 60 mg of that nutrient. The agency recognizes that a nutrient will not constitute precisely
100 percent of some dietary supplements, such as vitamin tablets or capsules, and advises that small amounts of excipients,
binders, lubricants, or disintegrants added for technological purposes are allowable in addition to the stated
nutrient content. 
Additionally, FDA points out that under 101.3(c), if a food is marketed in various optional forms, the particular
form is a necessary part of the statement of identity. Because vitamin C is marketed in tablet, capsule, and liquid
form, the form is part of the name. Therefore, this food should be called ``60 mg-vitamin C tablets.'' The agency acknowledges
an error in this regard in the proposal and is revising 101.65(b)(4) to make the correction. 
22. One comment stated that it is not unusual for a dietary supplement to contain several nutrients of one type and a
single nutrient of another type, such as ``multiple-vitamins with iron.'' The comment requested confirmation that
``with iron'' would not represent an implied nutrient content claim.
The agency advises that a term such as ``with iron,'' when used on the statement of identity of a supplement, is intended
to describe the nature of the food. When a statement of identity simply states ``with iron'' or specifies the amount
of iron in a product (e.g., ``multivitamin with 15 mg iron''), the statement is not a nutrient content claim. Such statements
fall under 101.65(b)(5). 
However, as the agency stated in 101.65(b)(5), there may be cases in which other statements on the label or labeling
would have the effect of making the statement into a nutrient content claim. For example, if the labeling of a multivitamin
with iron includes a discussion of the importance of iron in the diet, FDA believes the statement ``with iron'' would
be an implied claim that the multivitamin is a good source of iron. If the labeling is devoid of such information, FDA
would be unlikely to consider the name to be an implied nutrient content claim. The agency will evaluate such claims
on a case-by-case basis in the context of the entire label and labeling to determine whether they are nutrient content
claims. 
23. One comment maintained that FDA failed to address whether the currently used claim of ``high in antioxidants''
was within the scope of the proposed regulation.
While the term ``high in antioxidants'' was not explicitly discussed in the proposed regulations for nutrient content
claims for dietary supplements, the agency considers it to be an implied nutrient content claim that would come under
101.65. FDA's view is that this claim implies that the food on which it appears contains a ``high'' amount (i.e.,
at least 20 percent of the RDI, see 101.54(b)(1)) of each antioxidant. One problem with this claim, however,
is that there is no established definition of ``antioxidants.'' 
FDA believes that a logical place to start in defining this term is section 3(b)(1)(A)(x) of the 1990 amendments. That
provision directed FDA to determine whether a health claim on antioxidant vitamins and cancer, could be authorized
under the standard that it established for dietary supplements under section 403(r)(5)(D) of the act. In its proposed
regulations to implement the 1990 amendments, in response to this provision, FDA considered the effects of vitamin
C, vitamin E, and 

beta

-carotene on cancer because these nutrients are the vitamins or provitamins that function as antioxidants (56 FR
60624, November 27, 1991). In the final rule on antioxidant vitamins and cancer, FDA concluded that its selection
of these nutrients was appropriate (58 FR 2622, January 6, 1993). Thus, the agency has determined that the direct-acting
antioxidant vitamins or provitamins include vitamin C, vitamin E, and 

beta

-carotene. Based on its review of the information presented at a recent conference entitled ``Antioxidant Vitamins
and Cancer and Cardiovascular Disease,'' which was initiated by FDA, the agency is not aware of any basis to expand
this list because the biological role of other vitamins as direct antioxidants has not been confirmed (Ref. 3).
While it is arguable that FDA could authorize ``high in antioxidants'' as an implied claim pertaining to antioxidant
vitamins as a logical outgrowth of the proposal, because the claim applies to foods in conventional food form as well
as to dietary supplements, the agency believes that the better course is to propose to authorize such a claim. In addition,
the definition of ``antioxidants'' is not free from controversy. The agency is aware, based on its review of dietary
supplements whose labeling currently includes a ``high in antioxidant'' claim, that some manufacturers view this
term as including certain minerals. Antioxidant minerals have not been addressed by the agency, and, therefore,
final rules implementing the 1990 amendments do not provide for claims about them. Thus, FDA finds that a rulemaking
on the definition of ``antioxidants'' will provide an opportunity to establish the precise meaning of this term.
Consequently, FDA intends to address this issue as quickly as possible in a forthcoming proposal. Given that, elsewhere
in this issue of the 

Federal Register

, the agency is establishing a date of applicability of July 5, 1995, for this regulation, FDA anticipates that there
is sufficient time to take final action on such a proposal before that date.


2. ``Healthier''


24. One comment from a manufacturer observed that FDA proposed a regulation concerning use of the term ``healthy''
(proposed 101.65(d)(2) (58 FR 2949)) in the January 6, 1993 

Federal Register

 (58 FR 2944 at 2949). The comment notes that ``healthy'' and similar terms are used in a variety of contexts. For example,
one of the manufacturer's dietary supplements is labeled as ``the way to






a healthier life.'' The comment suggested that this claim should not be deemed to be subject to the ``healthy'' definition.


FDA advises that it is in the process of finalizing regulations on the January 6, 1993, proposal for the claim ``healthy.''
The use of terms such as ``healthy,'' ``healthier,'' ``healthiest'' will be addressed in that final rule. 
In its final rule on nutrient content claims, FDA concluded that a claim that a food, because of its nutrient content,
may be useful in maintaining healthy dietary practices is a claim that characterizes the level of a nutrient in that
food (58 FR 2302 at 2375). Accordingly, the agency provided in 101.65(d)(1) that such statements are implied
nutrient content claims and are subject to the requirements of section 403(r) of the act.
However, the agency also stated that when a term such as ``healthy,'' ``wholesome,'' or ``nutritious'' appears on
a food label in a context that does not render it an implied nutrient content claim, it is not subject to the requirements
of section 403(r) of the act (58 FR 2302 at 2375). Under such conditions, the use of the term is subject to section 403(a)
of the act, and FDA will consider whether it is misleading on a case-by-case basis. The agency intends to give more specific
guidance in the final rule on ``healthy.''


1. General Nutrition Claims Such as ``High Potency,'' ``High Absorption,'' and ``Balanced''
a. General issues


In the proposal on nutrient content claims for dietary supplements, FDA requested comment on terms, ``high potency,''
``high absorption,'' and ``balanced,'' which are often encountered on labels or in labeling of dietary supplements
and which seem to imply that the dietary supplement will contribute to good health (58 FR 33731 at 33748). The agency
requested comment on whether there are established meanings for these terms, and, if so, whether they characterize
the level of the nutrients in the food. FDA stated that if comments demonstrate that there are accepted definitions
used in the dietary supplement industry for these terms that characterize the level of nutrients, and that if it determines
that these definitions will assist consumers in maintaining healthy dietary practices, FDA will proceed with further
rulemaking to adopt the definitions or to propose new ones. 
FDA also stated that if the agency agrees that such terms are nutrient content claims, under the provisions of the statute,
such claims would be prohibited after the effective date for final rules, until such time as they are defined by FDA
by regulation. Further, FDA stated that if comments demonstrate that there are accepted definitions for these terms,
and they do not characterize the level of nutrients, in accordance with 101.65(d)(1) such terms would not be
subject to section 403(r) of the act unless used in a nutritional context in association with an explicit or implicit
claim or statement characterizing the nutrient content of the food. 
25. Several comments maintained that the terms ``high potency,'' ``high absorption,'' and ``balanced'' are implied
nutrient content claims and urged the agency to define or prohibit these terms. The comments stated that it is inappropriate
and fraught with possibilities for deception to allow each manufacturer to define such claims. One comment stated
that although these terms imply features of nutrient content to consumers, they do not have any established or useful
meaning with regard to dietary supplements. The comment argued that these terms seem to be more specific to dietary
supplements than to other food, so that their applicability in helping consumers make appropriate nutritional choices
from the variety of foods available seems limited. 
On the other hand, several comments stated that these terms do not inherently refer to the level of nutrients, are not
nutrient content claims, and therefore should not be defined. These comments maintained that such terms are formulation
descriptions, which properly and truthfully describe the nature and type of the product. These comments contended
that these terms have been used for many years, and that consumers have come to understand that products so described
provide an amount of the primary nutrients in the formulation that is at least equal to the RDA's for those nutrients.
One comment argued that FDA precedent exists for excluding such terms from regulation as nutrient content claims.
The comment stated that as formulation descriptions, these terms are useful to consumers in helping them to make product
choices, and manufacturers should be allowed to continue to use these terms in a manner that is consistent with FDA's
policy on claims such as ``maximum strength'' for internal analgesics in the over-the-counter drug review (i.e.,
kept outside the scope of this rulemaking). 
The agency agrees that these terms seem to have more direct application to dietary supplements than to foods in conventional
food form. Furthermore, these terms may have some utility in helping consumers select among dietary supplements.
However, while these terms have apparently been used for years to imply superiority, the agency is uncertain what
they mean to consumers.
The agency disagrees that these terms should be regulated in the same manner as terms such as ``maximum strength,''
which are used on the labels of over-the-counter drug products. The over-the-counter drug regulations include maximum
amount limitations. Section 411(a)(1)(A) of the act prohibits limits on the potency of dietary supplements of vitamins
or minerals except on the basis of safety. Therefore, the situations are not analogous.
The agency believes that each of these terms should be evaluated individually because they do not seem to be synonymous.
``High potency'' seems to focus on nutrient level or content, but ``balanced,'' as one comment suggested, seems to
be a formulation claim. ``High absorption'' seems to focus on how the body responds to the nutrient. The agency will
address each of these terms in more detail in the comments that follow.


b. Definition for ``high potency''


26. The majority of comments stated that the term ``high potency'' or ``full potency'' is an implied nutrient content
claim and should be defined. Several definitions were offered for this term. A few comments stated that multivitamins
and minerals are termed ``high potency'' when the majority of nutrients with established RDA's are present at the
levels equal to or in excess of the RDA. 
Similarly, another comment stated that the term should be restricted to formulations that contain micronutrients
at levels of at least twice the applicable RDI or DRV because a multivitamin at 100 percent of the DV might be ``high potency''
compared to a food in conventional food form but not ``high potency'' when compared to other dietary supplements.

Another comment suggested that FDA should require a ``high potency'' single-ingredient supplement to contain at
least twice the RDI, and that the front of the label should disclose what multiple of the RDI the supplement contains.
The comment acknowledged that under this scheme, some nutrients, such as calcium and selenium, would not qualify
to carry a ``high potency'' claim, because they are rarely sold at double the RDI. The comment suggested that if the
supplement industry begins to market those supplements at higher doses in order to make ``high potency'' claims,
then FDA could establish a lower minimum level, such as 50 percent more than the RDI for selenium or 50 percent of the
RDI for calcium. Those minimum levels would apply to those nutrients only. The comment also suggested that FDA should
allow ``high potency'' claims on multinutrient supplements when more than one-third of the nutrients that they contain
meet the minimum level required for a high potency claim, and the label discloses which nutrients are present at high
levels. For example, the label of a ``high potency'' multivitamin could carry an asterisk next to the claim, with the
following disclosure: ``contains high levels of [number] vitamins.''
Further, the comment stated that it is not reasonable to require that all of the nutrients in a multinutrient supplement
be present at levels that are necessary for high potency claims because many nutrients are not_and should not_be sold
in such high doses. For example, the comment suggested that ``high potency'' claims should be allowed on a multivitamin-and-mineral
supplement that contains at least double the RDI of vitamins A, C, E, B6, B12, thiamin, riboflavin, and niacin but smaller
amounts of vitamin D, iron, calcium, magnesium, zinc, and copper. The comment stated that the latter nutrients are
typically sold at doses lower than double the RDI and may pose a risk at high levels.
FDA has reviewed the comments and is persuaded that ``high potency'' is a claim that characterizes the level of a nutrient
and therefore meets the definition in 101.13(b) of a nutrient content claim. FDA also is persuaded by the comments
that this is a term that FDA should define in order to ensure that it will be useful to consumers in maintaining healthy
dietary practices. However, given the range and diversity of the suggested definitions, the agency is not prepared
to offer a definition of ``high potency'' at this time. FDA intends to review the suggestions it received on this issue
and based on information received in comments, issue a proposed rule on an appropriate definition of ``high potency.''

FDA recognizes that there is a need to provide this definition as quickly as possible. Therefore, FDA intends to act
on this matter as expeditiously as its resources allow.


c. Definitions for ``high absorption''


27. A couple of comments stated that the term ``high absorption'' does not refer to the level of nutrients but rather
to bioavailability or how efficiently the nutrients are released from the product and absorbed into the bloodstream.
One comment stated that ``high absorption'' means that the product meets the definition for ``high,'' and that a ``high
amount'' is digested and assimilated. 
Another comment stated that from a biological viewpoint, the extent to which nutrients are absorbed from food or supplements
depends not only on the chemical form of the nutrient itself but on the chemical environment presented by the carrier
food in which it is contained and on the physiological state of nutrient need of the individual consumer. Given these
factors, the comment stated that it is difficult to provide a meaningful definition of absorbability. 
One comment requested that the label should disclose information about the bioavailability of the product. Another
comment suggested that FDA should allow labels to make ``high absorption'' or similar claims only when the manufacturer
supplies bioavailability data showing that the product is better absorbed than a standard supplement. The comment
stated that the agency should not allow this claim on supplements that simply meet or exceed the United States Pharmacopeial
Convention's (USP's) (or other) standards for disintegration or dissolution, because meeting those standards
does not ensure that the product is well absorbed. 
The agency agrees that the term ``high absorption'' generally refers to how well a nutrient is absorbed into the system.
A product can be well absorbed irrespective of the quantitative amount found in the product. Accordingly, FDA finds
that ``high absorption'' is not a nutrient content claim and thus will not define this term. The use of this term is subject
to section 201(n) and 403(a) of the act, however. The agency expects that any product bearing a ``high absorption''
claim will contain the nutrients that are the subject of the claim in a form than can be readily assimilated by the body.
In addition, manufacturers who make a ``high absorption'' claim should have data available to support the claim and
should be prepared to make such data available to regulatory officials on request. Failure to do so could lead the agency
to conclude that there is no basis for the claim, and thus that it is false or misleading. 


d. Definitions for ``balanced''


28. A few comments stated that ``balanced'' is not a nutrient content claim. One comment suggested that ``balanced''
refers to the ratio of nutrients, not the level, and that the term can apply equally to products containing low or high
quantities of nutrients. Another comment stated that there is little need for FDA to define ``balanced'' because
most multinutrient supplements that are currently on the market do not contain nutrients in proportions that would
impair the absorption or utilization of other nutrients. The comment suggested that until researchers gain further
information on the most favorable proportions of nutrients in supplements, the agency should leave this term undefined
and therefore prohibited. Another comment suggested that ``balanced'' be defined as any supplement containing
from 50 to 150 percent of the RDI for each vitamin and mineral component of the product for which an RDI has been established.

The agency is persuaded by the comments that the term ``balanced'' does not typically characterize the level of nutrients,
but rather that it is a formulation claim that addresses the ratio of nutrients. The term ``balanced'' may be used in
different ways, each of which relates to the formulation of a product. For example, the term ``balanced'' may refer
to the assortment of nutrients that are present in a product, or it may reflect interactions between the nutrients
present, such as sparing effects or impairment or enhancement of absorption. Accordingly, this term does not meet
the definition for a nutrient content claim in 101.13(b). Therefore, the use of the term ``balanced'' is subject
to sections 403(a) and 201(n) of the act and not section 403(r) of the act. The agency will determine whether the use
of this term is misleading on a case-by-case basis.


e. Temporary suspension of the use of terms


29. One comment stated that use of the terms ``high potency,'' ``high absorption,'' and ``balanced'' should not be
suspended temporarily during the rulemaking process because such a suspension would result in unnecessary labeling
costs. Another comment requested additional time to comment on the definition of ``high potency'' and suggested
that until FDA defines this term, the agency should permit dietary supplement manufacturers to continue to use this
term as it is currently being used. The comment suggested that as an executive agency, FDA has inherent authority to
refrain from enforcing a statutory provision in circumstances in which the enforcement would do more harm than good.
The comment argued that to the extent that ``high potency'' is being used as part of a brand name (and was being used before
October 25, 1989), the 1990 amendments permit its continued use in the brand name until FDA has defined the term (section
403(r)(2)(C) of the act).
The comment argued that there is no reason for FDA to prohibit the use of a nutrient content claim while a definition
is being developed. Further, the comment noted that an enforcement moratorium would avoid the relabeling problem
that would arise if FDA disapproves and then reapproves use of the term within a short period of time. The comment stated
that FDA will continue to have authority to prohibit use of the term when such use is false or misleading. 
FDA advises that it intends to define ``high potency'' as a nutrient content claim in a separate rulemaking as quickly
as possible. The agency is postponing the date that it will apply this final rule on nutrient content claims on dietary
supplements until July 1, 1995. This postponement is discussed in detail in the document on the date of application
for the nutrition labeling and nutrient content claim requirements for dietary supplements found elsewhere in this
issue of the 

Federal Register

. FDA intends to complete its rulemaking on ``high potency'' in sufficient time to assure implementation by the time
that dietary supplement manufacturers will be required to comply with the nutrient content claim provisions.
The agency also advises that the term ``high potency,'' when used as part of a brand name, would fall under section 403(r)(2)(C)
of the act, if as the comment stated, it was used as part of the brand name before October 25, 1989. However, once this
term is defined by the Secretary, it will have to be used in a manner that complies with that definition. In addition,
use of the term in the brand name is subject to section 403(a) of the act, which prohibits the use of false and misleading
labeling irrespective of whether the use of the term in the brand name is exempt under section 403(r)(2)(C) of the act.
As discussed previously, the comments did not demonstrate that there are accepted definitions for any of these terms.
However, the comments have convinced the agency that the terms ``high absorption'' and ``balanced'' do not generally
characterize the level of nutrients. Accordingly, the agency concludes that these terms are not subject to section
403(r) of the act. 


4. Age Specific Claims


30. One comment stated that there are products with brand names that imply that the product is especially useful for
a particular segment of the population. The comment argued that it would therefore be appropriate for FDA to require
that these special formulas comply with clearly defined requirements (e.g., that they contain high amounts of particular
vitamins and minerals that are needed by the relevant group). Another comment maintained that such names mislead
consumers because they provide no explanation for those special population claims, and that in many cases, the supplements
do not contain levels of nutrients that are appropriate for the special population named in the claim. The comment
suggested that FDA should, at the very least, require labels to provide an explanation for these claims. For example,
an explanation for a product with a brand name implying that it is useful for women might state that ``this product is
especially suited for young women because it contains 100 percent of the RDI for folic acid and iron and 30 percent of
the RDI for calcium.''
FDA agrees that products marketed for special population groups may include claims or brand names that can be misleading.
These claims and brand names seem to imply a particular benefit for certain subgroups of the population and often do
not disclose how or why they meet the needs of that particular subgroup. Disclosure of such facts would help to protect
a product from being misbranded under section 403(a) of the act because its labeling would reveal material facts about
the product's claimed special usefulness.
However, such claims about the usefulness of a product for particular population groups generally fall under section
403(j) of the act to the extent that they represent the product to be for special dietary use. As special dietary use
claims, they are outside the scope of this rulemaking. Among other things, 105.3 defines ``special dietary
uses'' as ``uses for supplying particular dietary needs which exist by reason of a physical, physiological, pathological
or other condition, including but not limited to the conditions of disease, convalescence, pregnancy, lactation,
allergic hypersensitivity to food, underweight, and overweight; [and] [u]ses for supplying particular dietary
needs which exist by reason of age, including but not limited to the ages of infancy and childhood'' (105.3(a)(1)(i)
and (a)(l)(ii)). The agency intends to consider proposing regulations for such products. However, because of resource
constraints and other agency priorities, any such proposal will not be available in the immediate future. In the interim,
such claims will continue to be subject to the general misbranding provisions of sections 201(n) and 403(a) of the
act. 


5. ``Natural''


31. Several comments suggested that FDA define the term ``natural'' for dietary supplements because that term is
widely used in the labeling of dietary supplements even though there is no established definition of that term, and
it is misleading as it is now used. For example, one comment stated that studies indicate that natural vitamin E (d-

alpha

 tocopherol) is better utilized than synthetic vitamin E (dl-

alpha

 and other tocopherols), but that ``natural'' claims now appear on products containing synthetic vitamin E, misleading
consumers who think they are getting a better utilized product. The comment stated that in other instances, companies
use the term ``natural'' to mean that the product contains no artificial ingredients. 
One comment acknowledged that FDA has struggled with how to define this term for foods in conventional food form. This
comment suggested that the agency need not resolve the dilemma at this time, but that it should simply establish a supplement-specific
definition, just as FDA has established a special definition for ``natural flavor'' in 101.22. Another comment
suggested that FDA should allow ``natural'' claims on products containing only the naturally occurring form of a
vitamin. The comment suggested that FDA could request comments about whether to limit ``natural'' claims to nutrients,
such as vitamin E, that appear to offer some advantage when consumed in a natural form. The comment also stated that
many consumers will want the option of purchasing other nutrients in the natural form as well.
FDA is not persuaded by the comments that the term ``natural'' should be defined at this time. As one comment acknowledged,
the agency has recently expended its resources exploring the use of this term, and it was unable to arrive at an acceptable
definition (58 FR 2302 at 2407). FDA currently lacks sufficient resources to thoroughly explore and develop proposed
regulations for the use of this term on dietary supplements. 
In the final rule on nutrient content claims, the agency determined that it would maintain its current policy (as discussed
in the general principles proposal (56 FR 60421 at 60466) of interpreting this term to mean that nothing artificial
or synthetic (including all color additives regardless of source) has been included in, or has been added to, a food
(Ref. 7). FDA also decided that it would continue to distinguish between natural and artificial flavors as outlined
in 101.22. The agency concludes that, for the reasons cited above, it is appropriate to apply this policy to
dietary supplements. 
In this regard, FDA also points out that 101.9(k)(6) states that a food labeled under the provisions of this
section shall be deemed to be misbranded under sections 201(n) and 403(a) of the act if its label or labeling represents,
suggests, or implies, ``that a natural vitamin in a food is superior to an added or synthetic vitamin or to differentiate
in any way between vitamins naturally present from those added.'' 


V. Other Provisions


FDA did not receive any comments that dealt specifically with the other provisions of the proposal. In the absence
of any basis for doing otherwise, FDA is adopting those provisions as proposed. 


VI. Economic Impact


In its dietary supplement labeling proposals of June 18, 1993, FDA stated that the proposed rules on the labeling of
dietary supplements, taken as a whole, would have associated costs of approximately $20 million. Thus, the agency
concluded that the proposed rules would not constitute a major rule as defined by Executive Order 12291. In accordance
with the Regulatory Flexibility Act (Pub. L. 96354), FDA explored whether the proposed rules may have a significant
impact on small businesses and tentatively concluded that they do not.
FDA has evaluated the many comments that it received in response to its economic impact analysis. Because the issues
raised in the comments relate to all three proposals, FDA has combined its discussion of these comments and presented
them in the final rule regarding the date of application published elsewhere in this issue of the 

Federal Register

.
FDA has examined the economic implications of the final rules amending 21 CFR as required by Executive Order 12866
and the Regulatory Flexibility Act. Executive Order 12866 directs agencies to assess all costs and benefits of available
regulatory alternatives and, when regulation is necessary, to select regulatory approaches that maximize net benefits
(including potential economic, environmental, public health and safety effects; distributive impacts; and equity).
The Regulatory Flexibility Act requires the agency to analyze options for regulatory relief for small businesses.
FDA has concluded, based on its review of the available data and comments, that these final rules are not significant
as defined by Executive Order 12866. Further, in accordance with the Regulatory Flexibility Act, the agency certifies
that these final rules will not have a significant impact on a substantial number of small businesses.


VII. Environmental Impact


The agency has determined under 21 CFR 25.24(a)(11) that this action is of a type that does not individually or cumulatively
have a significant effect on the human environment. Therefore, neither an environmental assessment nor an environmental
impact statement is required.


VIII. Paperwork Reduction Act


In the June 18, 1993, proposal on nutrient content claims for dietary supplements (58 FR 33731 at 33749), FDA announced
that the agency had submitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) for its review the collection of information
requirements contained in proposed 101.69, for petitions regarding the use of nutrient content claims in
conjunction with food labeling on dietary supplements. Also in that document, FDA published its estimated annual
collection of information burden for this provision.
None of the more than 500 comments received in response to the dietary supplement proposal addressed the content of
petitions under the proposed nutrient content claim petition requirements. Thus, the agency's estimated annual
reporting and recordkeeping burden from the health claim petition requirements contained in this final rule remains
unchanged from that announced in June.
FDA has submitted copies of the final rule to OMB for its review of these reporting requirements.


IX. References


The following references have been placed on file in the Dockets Management Branch (address above) and may be seen
by interested persons between 9 a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday. 


1. Moss, A. J., A. S. Levy, I. Kim, Y. Park, ``Use of Vitamin and Mineral Supplements in the United States, Current Users,
Types of Products and Nutrients,'' Advance Data from Vital and Health Statistics of the National Center for Health
Statistics, No. 174, July 18, 1989.
2. Pennington, J. A. T., V. L. Wilkening, J. E. Vanderveen, ``Descriptive Terms for Food Labeling,'' 

Journal of Nutrition Education

, p. 51, June 1990. 
3. Transcript to Docket N289 for FDA-Initiated Public Conference: Antioxidant Vitamins and Cancer and Cardiovascular
Disease, November 1993.
4. Subcommittee on the 10th Edition of the Recommended Dietary Allowances, Food and Nutrition Board, Commission
on Life Sciences, National Research Council, ``Recommended Dietary Allowances, 10th Ed.,'' Washington, DC, National
Academy Press, 1989.
5. Committee on Diet and Health, Food and Nutrition Board, Commission on Life Sciences, National Research Council,
National Academy of Sciences, ``Diet and Health, Implications for Reducing Chronic Disease Risk,'' National Academy
Press, Washington, DC, 1989.
6. Committee on the Nutrition Components of Food Labeling, Food and Nutrition Board, Institute of Medicine, National
Academy of Sciences, ``Nutrition Labeling, Issues and Directions for the 1990's,'' Washington, DC, National Academy
Press, 1990.
7. Newberry, R., letter to Clinton K. Davies, September 29, 1988.


List of Subjects in 21 CFR Part 101


Food labeling, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.
Therefore, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and under authority delegated to the Commissioner of Food
and Drugs, 21 CFR part 101 is amended as follows: 


PART 101_FOOD LABELING



1. The authority citation for 21 CFR part 101 continues to read as follows:




Authority:

 Secs. 4, 5, 6, of the Fair Packaging and Labeling Act (15 U.S.C. 1453, 1454, 1455); secs. 201, 301, 402, 403, 409, 701
of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 321, 331, 342, 343, 348, 371).


2. Section 101.13, effective May 8, 1994, is amended by revising paragraph (a), by adding paragraph (b)(5), by revising
the first sentence in paragraph (c), introductory text of paragraph (i), (j)(1)(i)(A) and (j)(l)(i)(B), and (n)
to read as follows:


101.13 

Nutrient content claims_general principles.


(a) This section and the regulations in subpart D of this part apply to foods that are intended for human consumption
and that are offered for sale, including foods in conventional food form and dietary supplements of vitamins, minerals,
herbs, and other similar nutritional substances (dietary supplements).
(b) * * *
(5) For dietary supplements, claims for calories, fat, saturated fat, and cholesterol may not be made on products
that meet the criteria in 101.60(b)(1) or (b)(2) for ``calorie free'' or ``low calorie'' claims, except, in
the case of calorie claims, when an equivalent amount of a similar dietary supplement (e.g., another protein supplement)
that the labeled food resembles and for which it substitutes, normally exceeds the definition for ``low calorie''
in 101.60(b)(2).
(c) Information that is required or permitted by 101.9 or 101.36, as applicable, to be declared in nutrition
labeling, and that appears as part of the nutrition label, is not a nutrient content claim and is not subject to the requirements
of this section. * * *


* * * * *


(i) Except as provided in 101.9 or 101.36, as applicable, or in paragraph (q)(3) of this section, the
label or labeling of a product may contain a statement about the amount or percentage of a nutrient if:


* * * * *


(j) * * * 
(1) * * *
(i)(A) For ``less'' (or ``fewer'') and ``more'' claims, the reference food may be a dissimilar food within a product
category that can generally be substituted for one another in the diet (e.g., potato chips as reference for pretzels,
orange juice as a reference for vitamin C tablets) or a similar food (e.g., potato chips as reference for potato chips,
one brand of multivitamin as reference for another brand of multivitamin). 
(B) For ``light,'' ``reduced,'' ``added,'' ``fortified,'' and ``enriched'' claims, the reference food shall be
a similar food (e.g., potato chips as a reference for potato chips, one brand of multivitamin for another brand of multivitamin).



* * * * *


(n) Nutrition labeling in accordance with 101.9, 101.10, or 101.36, as applicable, shall be
provided for any food for which a nutrient content claim is made.


* * * * *


3. Section 101.54, effective May 8, 1994, is amended by revising paragraph (a)(3), (b)(1), (c)(1) and the introductory
text of paragraph (e)(1) to read as follows:


101.54 

Nutrient content claims for ``good source,'' ``high,'' and ``more.''


(a) *** 
(3) The food for which the claim is made is labeled in accordance with 101.9, 101.10, or 101.36,
as applicable.
(b) ``High'' claims. (1) The terms ``high,'' ``rich in,'' or ``excellent source of'' may be used on the label and in
the labeling of foods except meal products as defined in 101.13(l), main dish products as defined in 101.13(m),
and dietary supplements of vitamins or minerals to characterize the level of any substance that is not a vitamin or
mineral, provided that the food contains 20 percent or more of the RDI or the DRV per reference amount customarily consumed.


* * * * *


(c) ``Good Source'' claims. (1) The terms ``good source,'' ``contains,'' or ``provides'' may be used on the label
or in labeling of foods except meal products as described in 101.13(l) main dish products as described in 101.13(m),
and dietary supplements of vitamins or minerals to characterize the level of any substance that is not a vitamin or
mineral, provided that the food contains 10 to 19 percent of the RDI or the DRV per reference amount customarily consumed.


* * * * *


(e) ``More'' claims. (1) A relative claim using the terms ``more,'' ``fortified,'' ``enriched,'' and ``added''
may be used on the label or in labeling of foods to describe the level of protein, vitamins, minerals, dietary fiber,
or potassium except as limited by 101.13(j)(1)(i) and except meal products as defined in 101.13(l),
main dish products as defined in 101.13(m), and dietary supplements of vitamins or minerals to characterize
the level of any substance that is not a vitamin or mineral, provided that:


* * * * *


4. Section 101.60 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(3), by adding new paragraph (a)(4), by redesignating
paragraphs (c)(4) and (c)(5) as paragraphs (c)(5) and (c)(6), and adding a new paragraph (c)(4), and by revising the
introductory text of newly redesignated paragraph (c)(5) to read as follows:


101.60 

Nutrient content claims for the calorie content of foods.


(a) * * * 
(2) The claim is made in accordance with the general requirements for nutrient content claims in 101.13; 
(3) The food for which the claim is made is labeled in accordance with 101.9, 101.10, or 101.36,
as applicable; and
(4) For dietary supplements, claims regarding calories may not be made on products that meet the criteria in 101.60(b)(1)
or (b)(2) for ``calorie free'' or ``low calorie'' claims except when an equivalent amount of a similar dietary supplement
(e.g., another protein supplement) that the labeled food resembles and for which it substitutes, normally exceeds
the definition for ``low calorie'' in 101.60(b)(2).


* * * * *


(c) * * *
(4) The claims provided for in paragraph (c)(1) and (c)(2) of this section may be used on labels or in labeling of dietary
supplements of vitamins or minerals that are intended specifically for use by infants and children less than 2 years
of age.
(5) The terms ``reduced sugar,'' ``reduced in sugar,'' ``sugar reduced,'' ``less sugar,'' ``lower sugar'' or ``lower
in sugar'' may be used on the label or in labeling of foods, except meal products as defined in 101.13(l), main
dish products as defined in 101.13(m), and dietary supplements of vitamins or minerals, provided that:


* * * * *


6. Section 101.61 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(3) to read as follows: 
 

101.61 

Nutrient content claims for the sodium content of foods.


(a) * * * 
(3) The food for which the claim is made is labeled in accordance with 101.9, 101.10, or 101.36,
as applicable.


* * * * *


7. Section 101.62 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(3) and by adding paragraph (a)(4) to read as follows:


101.62 

Nutrient content claims for fat, fatty acid, and cholesterol content of foods.


(a) * * * 
(2) The claim is made in accordance with the general requirements for nutrient content claims in 101.13; 
(3) The food for which the claim is made is labeled in accordance with 101.9, 101.10, or 101.36,
as applicable; and
(4) For dietary supplements, claims for fat, saturated fat, and cholesterol may not be made on products that meet the
criteria in 101.60(b)(1) or (b)(2) for ``calorie free'' or ``low calorie'' claims. 


* * * * *


8. Section 101.65 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(3), (b)(3) and (b)(4) to read as follows:


101.65 

Implied nutrient content claims and related label statements.



(a) * * * 
(3) The food for which the claim is made is labeled in accordance with 101.9, 101.10, or 101.36,
as applicable.
(b) * * * 
(3) A claim about the presence of an ingredient that is perceived to add value to the product, e.g., ``made with real
butter,'' ``made with whole fruit,'' or ``contains honey,'' except that claims about the presence of ingredients
other than vitamins or minerals or that are represented as a source of vitamins and minerals are not allowed on labels
or in labeling of dietary supplements of vitamins and minerals that are not in conventional food form.
(4) A statement of identity for a food in which an ingredient constitutes essentially 100 percent of a food (e.g., ``corn
oil,'' ``oat bran,'' ``vitamin C 60 mg tablet'').


* * * * *




Dated: December 23, 1993

</SUPPLEM>
<SIGNER>
David A. Kessler,

</SIGNER>
<SIGNJOB>
Commissioner of Food and Drugs.

</SIGNJOB>
<SIGNER>
Donna E. Shalala,

</SIGNER>
<SIGNJOB>
Secretary of Health and Human Services.

</SIGNJOB>
<FRFILING>
[FR Doc. 9331814 Filed 122993; 8:45 am]

</FRFILING>
<BILLING>
BILLING CODE 416001F
</BILLING>

